Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 5
COOPERATION WITH THE UNITED STATES

23-31-501. Acceptance of congressional grant of 1862.

Full and complete acceptance, ratification, and assent is made and given by the state of Colorado to all of the provisions, terms, grants, and conditions and purposes of the grants made and prescribed by the act of the congress of the United States entitled "An Act to apply a portion of the proceeds of the public lands to the more complete endowment and support of the colleges for the benefit of agriculture and the mechanic arts.", established under the provisions of an act of congress, approved July 2, 1862.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 538, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-32-101 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-502. Board of governors of the Colorado state university system to control fund.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has the control of the fund appropriated by the said act of congress and shall disburse the same for the use and benefit of the Colorado state university and in accordance with the terms and provisions of said act of congress.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 538, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-32-102 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-503. Acceptance of congressional act of 1883.

Full and complete acceptance, ratification, and assent is made and given by the state of Colorado to all the provisions, terms, grants, and conditions and the purposes of the grants made and prescribed by the act of congress of the United States entitled "An Act donating public lands to the several states and territories which may provide colleges for the benefit of agriculture and mechanic arts.", approved July 2, 1862, as well as the amendments thereto, as made by the act of congress passed and adopted March 3, 1883, entitled "An Act to amend an act donating public lands to the several states and territories which may provide colleges for the benefit of agriculture and mechanic arts.", and all acts amendatory or supplementary to said acts.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 538, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-32-103 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-504. Control, investment, and expending of funds.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has control of the funds derived from the sale of lands donated by the said act of congress of 1862, and shall invest the same in securities which yield a fair and reasonable rate of return, and shall disburse the income therefrom for the use and benefit of the Colorado state university as required in the said act of congress. Said funds derived from the sale of lands donated by said act of 1862, and from lease or rental of unsold lands of such land grant, and from coal, oil, and mineral royalties from said lands may be invested in bonds of the United States; in state, county, municipal, and school district bonds; in state, county, and municipal registered warrants; in registered warrants of school districts; and in state anticipation building levy warrants, or in any or all of these, in the discretion of the board of governors of the Colorado state university system.

The warrants of the board of governors of the Colorado state university system to purchase such bonds, registered warrants, and anticipation warrants shall be approved and paid when accompanied by favorable opinion of the attorney general. All bonds, registered warrants, and anticipation warrants so purchased shall be registered in the name of the "treasurer of the state of Colorado for the account of the 'land grant fund of the Colorado state university'" and deposited with the state treasurer.

The general assembly of the state of Colorado engages that the principal of such fund forever remains unimpaired and the income thereof is applied without diminution to the uses and purposes prescribed in said act of congress; except that, as prescribed in said act of congress, a sum not exceeding ten percent of the principal of such fund may be expended by the board of governors of the Colorado state university system for the purchase or exchange of lands for sites or experimental stations, subject to the provisions of sections 24-75-301 to 24-75-303, C.R.S., and the approval of the governor.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 539, § 2, effective August 3.

L. 2014:

(3) amended, (HB 14-1387), ch. 378, p. 1836, § 35, effective June 6.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-32-104 as it existed prior to 2007.

Cross references:

(1) For experiment stations, see part 6 of this article.

(2) For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1387, see section 1 of chapter 378, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

23-31-505. Other funds - investment.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has the right to invest in the same manner as provided in section 23-31-504 any other permanent funds, the principal of which is not subject to use, that may be held by or granted to the state for the use of the Colorado state university or other institutions under the control of the board of governors of the Colorado state university system.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 539, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-32-106 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-506. Report on condition - appropriation.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system, on or before the fifteenth day of December immediately preceding the convening of the general assembly, shall make a report to the governor and the joint budget committee showing the condition of said fund, the investment thereof, the security taken therefor, and the amount of income derived therefrom. The report shall be submitted by the governor to the general assembly. If the report shows any loss in such funds, the amount of the loss shall be included in the governor's budget in order that the general assembly may fulfill the contractual obligations assumed by the state in accepting the provisions and grants of said act of congress of 1862 through an appropriation to repay the loss and keep the principal of such fund unimpaired.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 539, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-32-107 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-507. Management of funds.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system is designated to receive, manage, and disburse all funds not permanent in character derivable and derived under the several acts of congress supplementary to the act of congress of 1862.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 540, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-32-108 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-508. Purpose of sections.

It is the design of the general assembly in passing sections 23-31-503 to 23-31-508 to supplement and make more definite previous acts of acceptance of said several grants and the conditions thereof, and particularly to definitely provide for the management and investment of the permanent funds so derived, to the end that the engagements of the state with reference thereto may be kept.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 540, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-32-109 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-509. Acceptance of congressional act of 1928.

Full and complete acceptance, ratification, and assent is made and given by the state of Colorado to all the provisions, terms, grants, and conditions and purposes of the grants made and prescribed by the act of congress of the United States entitled "An Act to provide for the further development of agricultural extension work at the agricultural colleges in the several states, receiving the benefit of the act entitled 'An Act donating public lands to the several states and territories which may provide colleges for the benefit of agriculture and mechanic arts', approved July 2, 1862, and all acts supplementary thereto, and the United States department of agriculture, approved May 22, 1928". The action of the governor of the state in accepting in behalf of the state of Colorado the provisions of the said act of congress for the period from its approval to the adjournment of the present session of the general assembly as authorized by said act of congress is ratified.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 540, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-32-110 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-510. Control of funds.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has the control of the funds appropriated by the said act of congress and shall disburse the same in accordance with the terms and provisions of the act of congress.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 540, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-32-111 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-511. Congressional act of 1914 accepted.

Full and complete acceptance and assent is made and given by the state of Colorado to the provisions, terms, and conditions made and prescribed by the act of congress of the United States entitled "An Act to provide for cooperative agricultural extension work between the agricultural colleges in the several states receiving the benefits of an act of congress approved July 2, 1862, and of acts supplementary thereto, and the United States department of agriculture, known as the Smith-Lever Act, approved May 8, 1914". The Colorado state university in the state of Colorado is designated as the beneficiary of said act under the direction of the board of governors of the Colorado state university system.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 540, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-32-112 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-512. Board to receive and expend funds.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system is designated as the officer of the state of Colorado duly authorized to receive and expend the funds available under said act of congress to the state of Colorado for the uses and purposes therein prescribed.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 541, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-32-113 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-513. Acceptance of congressional act of 1935.

Full and complete acceptance, ratification, and assent is made and given by the state of Colorado to all the provisions, terms, grants, and conditions and purposes of the grants made and prescribed by the act of congress of the United States entitled "An Act to provide for research into basic laws and principles relating to agriculture and to provide for the further development of cooperative agricultural extension work and the more complete endowment and support of land-grant colleges", approved June 29, 1935. The action of the governor of the state in accepting in behalf of the state of Colorado the provisions of the said act of congress for the period from its approval to the adjournment of the thirty-first session of the general assembly as authorized by said act of congress is ratified.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 541, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-32-114 as it existed prior to 2007.

23-31-514. Control of funds from 1935 act.

The board of governors of the Colorado state university system has the control of the funds appropriated by the said act of congress and shall disburse the same for the use and benefit of the Colorado state university for instruction, for research and investigations, and for cooperative agricultural extension work in accordance with the terms and provisions of said act of congress.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 541, § 2, effective August 3.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 23-32-115 as it existed prior to 2007.